District of Columbia statutes.
3-308

Transfer of assets held in various funds.

All assets held in the Armory Board Working Capital Fund, the Canteen Fund of the District of Columbia National Guard, and the Stadium Operating Fund shall be transferred to the Starplex Fund; provided, that the assets in the Canteen Fund and any funds derived from the operation of a canteen fund and any funds derived from the operation of a canteen in the Armory for the use and benefit of the District of Columbia National Guard shall inure to the benefit of the District of Columbia National Guard.

June 4, 1948, 62 Stat. 341, ch. 418, § 8a
as added June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 7(o)(7), 27 DCR 1776
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 185, 56 DCR 1117

History

1981 Ed., § 2-308.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 17-353 deleted “established by § 3-307” following “Starplex Fund”.

Effect of Amendments

Section 3-307, referred to in this section, was repealed by D.C. Law 10-152, 41 DCR 4636, effective Aug. 23, 1994.

References in Text